Hawaii statutes.
F. Loans

[§11-371] Loan to candidate
committee. (a) A candidate or candidate committee may receive a loan from
any or all of the following:

(1) The candidate's own funds;

(2) A financial institution regulated by the State or
a federally chartered depository institution and made in accordance with
applicable law in the ordinary course of business;

(3) The candidate's immediate family in an aggregate
amount not to exceed $50,000 during an election period; provided that the
aggregate amount of loans and contributions received from the immediate family shall
not exceed $50,000 during an election period; and

(4) Persons other than the candidate, a financial
institution described in paragraph (2), or the candidate's immediate family, in
an aggregate amount not to exceed $10,000 during an election period; provided
that:

(A) If the $10,000 limit for loans from
persons other than the immediate family is reached, the candidate and candidate
committee shall be prohibited from receiving or accepting any other loans until
the $10,000 is repaid in full; and

(B) If a loan from persons other than the
candidate's immediate family is not repaid within one year of the date that the
loan is made, the candidate and candidate committee shall be prohibited from
accepting any other loans. All campaign funds, including contributions
subsequently received, shall be used to repay the outstanding loan in full.

(b) For purposes of this section, a "loan"
does not include expenditures made on behalf of a candidate committee by a
candidate, volunteer, or employee if:

(1) The candidate's, volunteer's, or employee's
aggregate expenditures do not exceed $1,500 within a thirty-day period;

(2) A dated receipt and a written description of the
name and address of each payee and the amount, date, and purpose of each
expenditure is provided to the candidate committee before the candidate
committee reimburses the candidate, volunteer, or employee; and

(3) The candidate committee reimburses the candidate,
volunteer, or employee within forty-five days of the expenditures being made.
[L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next